Utah statutes.
9-4-628.   Agreement by public body to accept payment from authority in lieu
of taxes.
In connection with any project of a housing authority located wholly or partly
within the area in which any public body is authorized to act, any public body
may agree with the housing authority with respect to the payment by the
authority of sums in lieu of taxes for any year or period of years that are
determined by the authority to be consistent with the maintenance of the low-
rent character of housing projects or the achievement of the purposes of this
part.
